Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Department of Audit

4-3-301. Creation.

The department of audit is created and established in the state government.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-335; T.C.A., § 4-332.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability of Open Meetings Act to exit conference with comptroller, OAG 99-090, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90 (4/12/99).

4-3-302. Administrative head of department.

The comptroller of the treasury shall be the administrative head of this department.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 255.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-335; T.C.A., § 4-332; modified.

Cross-References. Comptroller of the treasury as constitutional officer, appointment, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 3.

Office of local government in office of comptroller, title 4, ch. 16.

4-3-303. Organization of department.

The department of audit shall be organized in whatever manner the comptroller of the treasury may deem best to the accomplishment of its functions.

The department shall have such auditors, assistants and employees as the comptroller of the treasury may require, subject to the budgetary and personnel provisions of § 4-4-107 and within the appropriations made by the general assembly.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 71; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.71 (Williams, § 255.76); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-337.

Cross-References. Office of local government in office of comptroller, title 4, ch. 16.

Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-304. Powers and duties.

The department of audit has the power and is required to:

Perform currently a post audit of all accounts and other financial records of the state government, and of any department, institution, office or agency thereof in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and in accordance with such procedures as may be established by the comptroller of the treasury;

Make annually, and at such other times as the general assembly shall require, a complete report on the post audit, such report to be in the form provided by §§ 8-4-109 — 8-4-111 and by any subsequent legislation;

Certify to the fund balance sheets, operating and other statements, covering the condition of the state's finances, as prepared by the department of finance and administration, or by the state treasurer, before publication of such statements;

Serve as a staff agency to the general assembly, or to any of its committees, in making investigations of any phase of the state's finances;

Make annually an audit of all the records of the several counties of the state, including the offices of county trustees, circuit court clerks, criminal court clerks, county clerks and clerks and masters of chancery courts, and all county mayors and judges of the courts of general sessions, specifically including the accounts of all “trust funds” in the hands of clerks and masters, or county clerks, or both, and any other county official, whether elected or appointed;

In lieu of the audit required under this subdivision (4), the department may accept an audit made by an independent certified public accountant or licensed public accountant, employed at the expense of the county, if the audit made by such independent certified public accountant or licensed public accountant meets the minimum standards for county auditing established by the comptroller of the treasury, and approved by the governor;

The audit shall be made annually and copies of the audit furnished to the comptroller of the treasury;

Any county having an audit made by an independent certified public accountant or licensed public accountant under the conditions prescribed in this subdivision (4) shall be relieved of paying to the state the fee required by § 9-3-210;

Beginning July 1, 1974, the department shall prepare the audit required under this subdivision (4) in each county of this state at least once in every five-year period, and shall not accept an audit prepared by a certified public accountant or licensed public accountant in lieu of a state audit for more than four (4) years in every five-year period beginning July 1, 1974, or may, in such manner as the comptroller of the treasury may determine, participate with or monitor the audit with the independent certified public accountant or licensed public accountant;

Devise a modern, effective and uniform system of bookkeeping and accounting, subject to the approval of the governor, comprehending:

An efficient system of checks and balances between the officers at the seat of government entrusted with the collections and receipts, custody and disbursement of the revenues of the state; and

A system of bookkeeping and accounting, for the use of all county officials and agencies handling the revenues of the state or of any political subdivision thereof; provided, that the comptroller of the treasury and the governor may approve any existing system;

Perform economy and efficiency audits, program results audits and program evaluations. Any or all of the elements of an audit may be performed, including financial and compliance, economy and efficiency program results and program evaluation;

Require that audits to be performed by the internal audit staffs of grantees or the internal audit staffs of state departments, boards, commissions, institutions, agencies, authorities or other entities of the state shall be coordinated with the office of the comptroller of the treasury, and any such audit reports as may be issued shall be prepared in accordance with standards established by the comptroller of the treasury. No department, agency, institution, board, commission or authority shall cause internal auditing to be performed by persons who do not meet the job specifications for internal auditors established by the commissioner of human resources and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, working papers created, obtained or compiled by an internal audit staff are confidential and are therefore not an open record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7. “Working papers” includes, but is not limited to, auditee records, intra-agency and interagency communications, draft reports, schedules, notes, memoranda and all other records relating to an audit or investigation by internal audit staff;

Require that all persons, corporations or other entities receiving grants from or through this state shall cause a timely audit to be performed, in accordance with auditing standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury; and

Establish minimum standards for the performance of audits by the internal audit staffs of local governments, special taxing districts, utility districts, political subdivisions, state departments, boards, commissions, institutions, agencies, authorities or other entities of the state. These standards, which shall be established by the comptroller of the treasury, shall include “Standards for the Professional Practice of Internal Auditing” published by the Institute of Internal Auditors, Inc., or such other standards as may be approved by the comptroller of the treasury. All audit reports issued by such internal audit staffs shall include a statement that the audit was conducted pursuant to these standards. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, working papers created, obtained or compiled by an internal audit staff are confidential and are therefore not an open record pursuant to title 10, chapter 7. “Working papers” includes, but is not limited to, auditee records, intra-agency and interagency communications, draft reports, schedules, notes, memoranda and all other records relating to an audit or investigation by internal audit staff.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 72; 1937, ch. 286, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 40; 1941, ch. 96, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.72 (Williams, § 255.77); Acts 1953, ch. 22, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1974, ch. 616, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 221, §§ 1-3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 1979, ch. 18, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-336; Acts 1984, ch. 794, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 368, §§ 3, 4; 2011, ch. 151, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Examination of accounts of departments, institutions, offices or agencies receiving appropriations from the state, by the department of finance and administration, §4-3-1007.

Housing development agency, audits, §13-23-125.

Uncompensated care, §68-1-109.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate funds are required to be handled by the sheriff consistent with the standards established by the state comptroller's county audit division, OAG 06-156 (10/9/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176.

4-3-305. Administration by comptroller of the treasury.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized to administer all or any part of the powers and duties prescribed in subsection (b).

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall, when a general act for county budgeting, or a county fiscal control act, is enacted, have authority to:

Prescribe forms and procedures for the preparation of annual budgets in the several counties and in the other local governments;

Require from the proper local authority a copy of the annual budget as adopted by the governing body of each county or other local government;

Prepare a flexible system of uniform accounts for the various counties and for the other local governments, and assist the local authorities in its installation;

Require annually from each county and other local government a financial report, showing in itemized form all expenditures for current operation and maintenance, for capital outlays, for debt retirement and interest charges and for any other expenses, and also setting forth in detail all revenues and other sources of income;

Audit the accounts of all county and other local governments, such audit to be made either by the auditors of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee or by private accountants approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee;

Promulgate regulations with respect to the issuance of county and municipal bonds, the refunding and retirement of county and municipal debts and the handling of county or municipal defaults; and

Study the state subsidies and turn-backs to county and other local governments for highway, welfare, educational and other purposes, and make recommendations to the governor on the fiscal aspects of such subsidies and turn-backs.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, upon the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, a municipality or county is authorized to prepare and adopt a biennial budget for such departments as authorized by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The budgets shall be prepared as required by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and after all necessary changes have been made to the local government's charter, private acts, resolutions, or ordinances, as appropriate.

In preparing such budgets, careful consideration shall be given to ensure there is no impairment to an existing contract, bond obligation, or anticipation note of the governmental entity.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 43; 1939, ch. 11, §§ 10, 24, 25; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.43 (Williams, § 255.44); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; T.C.A., § 4-332; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-333; Acts 1982, ch. 574, § 1; 2004, ch. 436, § 1; 2010, ch. 868, §§ 4-7.

Cross-References. Accounting system, standard for counties, §§5-8-501 —5-8-503.

4-3-306. State funding board.

The state funding board is attached to the office of the comptroller of the treasury for all administrative purposes.

The state funding board is authorized to establish policies and procedures under which the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall be guided in the administration of state laws concerning bond and note issues by counties, municipalities and utility districts.

Noncompliance with subdivision (b)(1) shall not invalidate any bonds issued by a unit of local government.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; 1978, ch. 864, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 4-332, 4-333; Acts 2010, ch. 868, §§ 8, 9.

Cross-References. State funding board, §9-9-101.

4-3-307. Expenses of department representatives.

The necessary expenses of any representative of the department of audit assigned to duty away from the seat of government shall be reimbursed under the rules and regulations prescribed by the commissioner of finance and administration. All such expenses, before being paid, shall first be approved by the office of the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1923, ch. 92, §§ 1(19), 1(20); Code 1932, § 345; Acts 1933, ch. 92, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 345; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-338; T.C.A., § 4-335.

4-3-308. Office of research and education accountability.

There is established within the office of the comptroller of the treasury an office of research and education accountability, which shall conduct research, analyses, evaluations, and other projects as may be assigned to it by the general assembly or the comptroller, or that the office may determine to be necessary to inform discussions and decisions in the general assembly.

The office of research and education accountability shall be accorded access to and may examine any information, records, books, data, or reports maintained by any agency of this state, whether or not the information is subject to public inspection. Each agency shall fully cooperate with the office of research and education accountability in providing such access in the performance of the duties of the office. The office of research and education accountability shall maintain inviolate any privileged or confidential information so acquired and any record or writing so defined by law.

The office of research and education accountability shall report its findings annually to the general assembly.

As used in this section, “agency” means:

Any department, board, commission, institution, office, or agency of state government; and

Any county, county having a metropolitan government, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, including any school district, school system, or special school district, and the state board of education acting on behalf of any special school listed in § 49-50-1001.

Acts 1992, ch. 535, § 47; 2016, ch. 684, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of the Education Improvement Act, Acts 1992, ch. 535, see the Session Law Disposition Table in Volume 13.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.